Utah statutes.
79-3-302.   Members of board -- Qualifications and appointment -- Vacancies
-- Organization -- Meetings -- Financial gain prohibited -- Expenses.
(1)  The board consists of seven members appointed by the governor, with the
consent of the Senate.
(2)  In addition to the requirements of Section 79-2-203, the members shall
have the following qualifications:
(a)  one member knowledgeable in the field of geology as applied to the
practice of civil engineering;
(b)  four members knowledgeable and representative of various segments of the
mineral industry throughout the state, such as hydrocarbons, solid fuels,
metals, and industrial minerals;
(c)  one member knowledgeable of the economic or scientific interests of the
mineral industry in the state; and
(d)  one member who is interested in the goals of the survey and from the
public at large.
(3)  The director of the School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration
is an ex officio member of the board but without any voting privileges.
(4) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (4)(b), members are appointed for
terms of four years.
(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (4)(a), the governor
shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms
to ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so that approximately
half of the board is appointed every two years.
(c)  No more than four members may be of the same political party.
(d)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term by the governor with the consent of
the Senate.
(5)  The board shall select from its members a chair and such officers and
committees as it considers necessary.
(6) (a)  The board shall hold meetings at least quarterly on such dates as may
be set by its chair.
(b)  Special meetings may be held upon notice of the chair or by a majority of
its members.
(c)  A majority of the members of the board present at a meeting constitutes a
quorum for the transaction of business.
(7)  Members of the board may not obtain financial gain by reason of
information obtained during the course of their official duties.
(8) (a) (i)  A member who is not a government employee may not receive
compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem
and expenses incurred in the performance of the member’s official duties at
the rates established by the Division of Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(ii)  A member may decline to receive per diem and expenses for the member's
service.
(b) (i)  A state government officer and employee member who does not receive
salary, per diem, or expenses from the agency the member represents for the
member's service may receive per diem and expenses incurred in the performance
of the member's official duties at the rates established by the Division of
Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(ii)  A state government officer and employee member may decline to receive
per diem and expenses for the member's service.
